Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 98. ARKANSAS MEDICAL MARIJUANA AMENDMENT OF 2016.
§
4. Qualifying patient — Administration and enforcement — Rules.

The Department of Health shall administer and enforce the provisions of this amendment concerning qualifying patients, qualifying medical conditions, and designated caregivers, including without limitation the issuance of a registry identification card to a qualifying patient and designated caregiver.

The department shall adopt rules necessary to:

Carry out the purposes of this amendment; and

Perform its duties under this amendment.

Rules adopted under this section are rules as defined in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The Department of Health shall require each applicant for a designated caregiver registry identification card to apply for or authorize the Department of Health to obtain state and national criminal background checks to be conducted by the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The criminal background checks shall conform to the applicable federal standards and shall include the taking of fingerprints.

The applicant shall authorize the release of the criminal background checks to the Department of Health and shall be responsible for the payment of any fee associated with the criminal background checks.

Upon completion of the criminal background checks, the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall forward to the Department of Health all information obtained concerning the applicant.

Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this amendment, the department shall adopt rules governing:

The manner in which the department considers applications for and renewals of registry identification cards;

Labeling and testing standards for marijuana distributed to qualifying patients, including a warning label on all marijuana for medical use that is processed or sold for smoking that communicates the health and safety risks associated with smoking and a list of places and conditions in which smoking marijuana for medical use is illegal in the State of Arkansas; and

Any other matters necessary for the department's fair, impartial, stringent, and comprehensive administration of this amendment.

Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this amendment, the department shall adopt rules that govern the manner in which the department considers petitions from the public to add medical conditions or treatments to the list of qualifying medical conditions set forth in § 2 of this amendment.

In considering a petition, the department shall add medical conditions or treatments to the list of qualifying medical conditions set forth in § 2 of this amendment if patients suffering from the medical conditions or undergoing the treatments in question would derive therapeutic benefit from the use of marijuana, taking into account the positive and negative health effects of such use.

The department shall, after hearing, approve or deny a petition within one hundred twenty (120) days of submission of the petition.

The approval or denial of a petition constitutes final agency action, subject to judicial review, and jurisdiction for judicial review is vested in the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

The department shall adopt rules within one hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of this amendment that govern the manner in which a designated caregiver assists a physically disabled qualifying patient or a qualifying patient under the age of eighteen (18) with the medical use of marijuana.

The department may collect fines or fees for any violation of a rule adopted under this section. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 4, §§ 2, 3; 2017, No. 545, § 1; 2017, No. 639, § 1; 2017, No. 740, § 2; 2017, No. 1023, § 2; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 1, §§ 3, 4; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, §§ 3, 4.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 4, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Transparency and participation by the public in the development of rules to implement the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016 requires sufficient time to publish rules, allow for comment by the public, and incorporate comments as appropriate;

“(2)

One hundred eighty (180) days from the effective date of the amendment is a reasonable amount of time to comply with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;

“(3)

The fiscal year for the State of Arkansas begins on July 1 of each year and ends on June 30 of each year;

“(4)

It is an unwise expenditure of public resources to enact the necessary appropriations, acts, and establish the necessary fiscal and regulatory provisions for a one-month period beginning on June 1, 2017; and

“(5)

The date of July 1, 2017, is a better effective date for the Medical Marijuana Commission to begin accepting applications.”

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 1023, § 2, which amended subdivision (b)(2) of this section, was repealed by Identical Acts 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 1 and 8, § 3, before taking effect.

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 4 substituted “one hundred eighty (180) days” for “one hundred twenty (120) days” in the introductory language of (b) and in (d); and substituted “the department” for “it” in (b)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 545 added (a)(4).

The 2017 amendment by No. 639 added (e).

The 2017 amendment by No. 740 inserted “including a warning label on all marijuana for medical use that is processed or sold for smoking that communicates the health and safety risks associated with smoking and a list of places and conditions in which smoking marijuana for medical use is illegal in the State of Arkansas” in (b)(2).

The 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 1 and 8 substituted “one hundred eighty (180) days” for “one hundred twenty (120) days” in the introductory language of (b); substituted “the department” for “it” in (b)(1); and inserted
“including a warning label on all marijuana for medical use that is processed or sold for smoking that communicates the health and safety risks associated with smoking and a list of places and conditions in which smoking marijuana for medical use is illegal in the State of Arkansas” in (b)(2).

§
5. Registry identification cards.

The Department of Health shall issue registry identification cards to qualifying patients and designated caregivers who submit in accordance with the rules promulgated by the department:

Written certification issued by a physician within thirty (30) days of the application;

A reasonable application or renewal fee as established by the department by rule.

The department may establish a sliding scale of application and renewal fees based upon a qualifying patient's family income;

The name, address, and date of birth of the qualifying patient or designated caregiver, except that if the applicant is homeless, no address is required;

For a designated caregiver application:

The name of the physically disabled qualifying patient or qualifying patient under the age of eighteen (18) whom the applicant will be assisting; and

Documentation from the qualifying patient's physician indicating that the qualifying patient is physically disabled or under the age of eighteen (18);

The name, address, and telephone number of the qualifying patient's physician; and

A signed statement from the qualifying patient or designated caregiver pledging not to divert marijuana to anyone who is not allowed to possess marijuana under this amendment.

The department shall not issue a registry identification card to a qualifying patient who is under eighteen (18) years of age unless:

The qualifying patient's physician has explained the potential risks and benefits of the medical use of marijuana to the qualifying patient and to a parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of the qualifying patient; and

A parent, guardian, or person having legal custody:

Consents in writing to:

Allow the qualifying patient's medical use of marijuana;

Assist the qualifying patient in the medical use of marijuana; and

Control the acquisition of the marijuana, the dosage, and the frequency of the medical use of marijuana by the qualifying patient; and

Registers as a designated caregiver under this amendment.

The department shall review the information contained in an application or renewal submitted under this section within fourteen (14) days of receiving it.

The department shall deny an application or renewal if the:

Applicant previously had a registry identification card revoked; or

Department determines the written certification was not made in the context of a physician-patient relationship or that the written certification was fraudulently obtained.

Rejection of an application or renewal is considered a final agency action, subject to judicial review, and jurisdiction is vested in the Pulaski County Circuit Court.

A registry identification card expires one (1) year after the date of issuance unless the physician states in the written certification that he or she believes the qualifying patient would benefit from the medical use of marijuana only until a specified earlier date.

If the written certification specifies an earlier date, the registry identification card shall expire on that date.

The department shall verify to law enforcement personnel whether a registry identification card is valid without disclosing more information than is reasonably necessary to verify the authenticity of the registry identification card.

A person, including without limitation an employee or official of the department, division, commission, or another state agency or local government, who knowingly breaches the confidentiality of information obtained under this amendment commits a Class A misdemeanor.

A qualifying patient or designated caregiver from giving up to two and one-half ounces (2 ½ oz.) of usable marijuana to another qualifying patient or designated caregiver as set forth in § 3 of this amendment; or

The transfer of marijuana seedlings, plants, or usable marijuana as set forth in § 3 of this amendment.

The number of licensed dispensaries;

The number of licensed cultivation facilities;

The number of dispensary agents; and

The number of cultivation facility agents. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 5, § 2; 2017, No. 948, § 1.]

(f)
(1)

An application or renewal and supporting information submitted by a qualifying patient or designated caregiver under this amendment, including without limitation information regarding the qualifying patient's physician, are considered confidential records that are exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.

(2)
(A)
(i)

The department shall maintain a confidential list of the persons to whom the department has issued registry identification cards.

(ii)
(a)

The department may share information from the confidential list under this subsection with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Medical Marijuana Commission as necessary and the State Insurance Department for the purposes of the Arkansas all-payer claims database established under § 23-61-901 et seq.

(b)

Confidential information shared with the division or commission shall remain confidential while in the division's or commission's possession.

(B)

Individual names and other identifying information on the confidential list are confidential, exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., and not subject to disclosure except to authorized employees of the department, division, and commission as necessary to perform official duties of the department, division, and commission.

(g)
(1)

Except as provided in § 3 of this amendment, a cardholder who transfers marijuana to a person who is not a qualifying patient or designated caregiver under this amendment shall have his or her registry identification card revoked and shall be subject to any other penalties established by law.

(2)

The department may revoke the registry identification card of any cardholder who knowingly violates any provision of this amendment, and the cardholder is subject to any other penalties established by law.

(3)

This subsection does not prohibit:

(h)

The department, division, and commission shall submit to the General Assembly an annual report that does not disclose any identifying information about cardholders or physicians but contains at a minimum:

(1)

The number of applications and renewals filed for registry identification cards;

(2)

The nature of the qualifying medical conditions of the qualifying patients;

(3)

The number of registry identification cards revoked and the number of licenses to operate a dispensary and licenses to operate a cultivation facility revoked;

(4)

The number of physicians providing written certifications for qualifying patients;

Publisher's Notes.

This section as adopted does not contain a subsection (e).

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 5 substituted “records that are exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.” for “medical records” at the end of (f)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 948 redesignated former (f)(2)(A)(ii) as present (f)(2)(A)(ii)

(a)

and (f)(2)(A)(ii)

(b)

; and added “and the State Insurance Department for the purposes of the Arkansas all-payer claims database established under § 23-61-901 et seq.” at the end of (f)(2)(A)(ii)

(a)

§
6. Scope.

This amendment does not permit a person to:

Undertake any task under the influence of marijuana when doing so would constitute negligence or professional malpractice;

Possess, smoke, or otherwise engage in the medical use of marijuana:

On a school bus;

On the grounds of a daycare center, preschool, primary or secondary school, college, or university;

At a drug or alcohol treatment facility;

At a community or recreation center;

In a correctional facility;

On any form of public transportation;

In a public place; or

On any property that is under control of the Arkansas National Guard or the United States military;

Operate, navigate, or be in actual physical control of a motor vehicle, aircraft, motorized watercraft, or any other vehicle drawn by power other than muscle power while under the influence of marijuana;

Smoke marijuana:

In a place where the smoking of tobacco is prohibited by law;

In the presence of a person who is under fourteen (14) years of age;

Inside a motor vehicle, aircraft, motorized watercraft, or any vehicle drawn by power other than muscle power;

Knowingly in the presence of a pregnant woman; or

In a place where the smoking of marijuana for medical use is likely to cause another person not authorized to use marijuana to be under the influence of marijuana; or

Smoke marijuana for medical use if the person is under twenty-one (21) years of age.

This amendment does not require:

A government medical assistance program or private health insurer to reimburse a person for costs associated with the medical use of marijuana unless federal law requires reimbursement;

An employer to accommodate the ingestion of marijuana in a workplace or an employee working while under the influence of marijuana;

An individual or establishment in lawful possession of property to allow a guest, client, customer, or other visitor to use marijuana on or in that property;

An individual or establishment in lawful possession of property to admit a guest, client, customer, or other visitor who is inebriated as a result of his or her medical used of marijuana;

A landlord to permit a qualifying patient to smoke marijuana on or in leased property, except that a landlord may not prohibit the medical use of marijuana through means other than smoking on leased property by a qualifying patient; or

A public school to permit a qualifying patient who is a student to be present on school grounds, to attend a school event, or to participate in extracurricular activities in violation of the public school's student discipline policies when a school office has a good faith belief that the behavior of the qualifying patient is impaired. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 479, § 3; 2017, No. 740, § 1; 2017, No. 1099, § 1; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 5; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 5.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 479 added (a)(2)(H).

The 2017 amendment by No. 740 inserted “medical” in the introductory language of (a)(2); and added (a)(4) and (a)(5).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1099 added (b)(6).

The 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 1 and 8 inserted “medical” in the introductory language of (a)(2); added (a)(2)(H); and added (a)(4) and (a)(5).

§
7. Affirmative defense and dismissal for medical use of marijuana.

Except as provided in § 6 of this amendment and this section, an individual may assert a medical purpose for using marijuana as an affirmative defense to prosecution for an offense involving marijuana intended for the individual's medical use, and this defense shall be presumed valid and the prosecution shall be dismissed where the evidence demonstrates that the individual is:

A qualifying patient or a designated caregiver; and

In compliance with the conditions set forth in § 3 of this amendment.

The defense and motion to dismiss shall not prevail if either of the following are proven:

The individual's registry identification card had been revoked at the time of the alleged offense; or

The purposes for the possession of marijuana were not solely for medical use.

An individual is not required to be in actual physical possession of a registry identification card to raise the affirmative defense set forth in this section.

If an individual demonstrates a medical use of marijuana under this section, except as provided in § 6 of this amendment, the individual shall not be subject to the following:

Disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or bureau; or

Forfeiture of any interest in or right to nonmarijuana, licit property.